Utah statutes.
57-8-22.   Removal of property from statutory provisions.

(1) All of the unit owners may remove a property from the provisions of this act by an instrument duly recorded to that effect, provided that the holders of all liens affecting any of the units consent or agree by instruments duly recorded, that their liens be transferred to the percentage of the undivided interest of the unit owner in the property.

(2)  Upon removal of the property from the provisions of this act, the property shall be deemed to be owned in common by the unit owners. The undivided interest in the property owned in common which shall appertain to each unit owner shall be the percentage of undivided interest previously owned by such owner in the common areas and facilities.



Enacted by Chapter 111, 1963 General Session

